Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-305
Employment certificate; contents.

Such certificate shall state the date and place of birth of such child and describe the color of the hair and eyes, the height and weight and any distinguishing facial marks of such child, and that the papers required by section 48-304 have been duly examined, approved and filed, and that the child named in such certificate has appeared before the officer signing the certificate and been examined.

Laws 1907, c. 66, § 5, p. 262;

R.S.1913, § 3579;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. IV, art. III, § 5, p. 552;

C.S.1922, § 7673;

C.S.1929, § 48-305;

R.S.1943, § 48-305.